Alabama, session 2026rs, HB96.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
14 Section 1. Sections 6-10-1 and 6-10-2, Code of Alabama
15 1975 are amended to read as follows:
16 "§6-10-1
17 (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),The the right
18 of to a homestead or other exemption shall be governed by the
19 law in force effect when the debt or demand was created, but
20 the mode or remedy procedures or remedies for asserting,
21 ascertaining, contesting, and determining claims thereto shall
22 be as prescribed in this chapter.
23 (b) For any case filed under the United States
24 Bankruptcy Code, Title 11 U.S.C., the amount of the debtor's
25 homestead or other exemption, as provided by this chapter,
26 shall be governed by the law in effect as of the date the
27 bankruptcy petition is filed."
28 "§6-10-2
Page 1

"§6-10-2
HB96 Enrolled
29 (a) The homestead of every resident of this state, with
30 the including improvements and appurtenances, not exceeding
31 which does not exceed 160 acres in size and is value no more
32 than:in value (i) fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000); or (ii)
33 fifty-six thousand four hundred dollars ($56,400) if the
34 resident is either 62 years of age or older or an individual
35 with a disability, shall be exempt from levy, sale, execution
36 or other process for debt collection during his or her
37 lifetime and occupancy and in area 160 acres, shall be; to the
38 extent of any interest he or she may have therein in the
39 property, whether a fee simple or less estate or whether held
40 in common or in severalty held individually or jointly.,
41 exempt from levy and sale under execution or other process for
42 the collection of debts during his or her life and occupancy
43 and, if If he or she leaves surviving him or her a surviving
44 spouse and a minor child, or children, or either, the
45 exemption applies during the life lifetime of the surviving
46 spouse and minority of the child, or children, but the area
47 size of the homestead shall not be enlarged by reason of
48 increased due to any encumbrance thereon on the property or of
49 the character nature of the estate or interest owned therein
50 by him or her he or she owns. When a husband and wife jointly
51 own a homestead is jointly owned, each owner is entitled to
52 claim separately the exemption separately provided herein, to
53 the same extent and value as an unmarried individual. For
54 purposes of this section and Sections 6-10-38 and 6-10-40, a
55 mobile home or similar dwelling if used as the principal place
56 of residence of the individual claiming the exemption shall be
Page 2

of residence of the individual claiming the exemption shall be
HB96 Enrolled
57 deemed to be considered a homestead.
58 (b) For the purposes of this section, "individual with
59 a disability" has the same meaning as the term is defined in
60 Section 21-7-1. Proof of disability shall include any of the
61 following:
62 (1) A disability determination letter from: (i) the
63 armed services; (ii) a state or federal government agency;
64 (iii) a private insurer; or (iv) a workers compensation
65 settlement agreement.
66 (2) Receipt of benefits resulting from a disability
67 determination in subdivision (1).
68 (3) Written and sworn affidavits of two physicians
69 licensed to practice medicine in Alabama who certify the
70 disability, provided that at least one of the physicians is
71 actively providing treatment directly related to the
72 disability of the individual seeking the exemption. Physician
73 affidavits must be on a form prescribed by the Alabama
74 Department of Revenue for seeking an ad valorem exemption
75 pursuant to Section 40-9-21."
76 Section 2. Sections 6-10-38 and 6-10-40, Code of
77 Alabama 1975, are amended to make conforming changes to read
78 as follows:
79 "§6-10-38
80 (a)(1) If, on the trial of a contest of a claim of
81 homestead exemption, it is found that the homestead as claimed
82 exceeds $5,000 in value (or if a husband and wife have both
83 claimed the exemption to which each is entitled, $10,000), or
84 160 acres in area, exceeds the value and size limits set forth
Page 3

160 acres in area, exceeds the value and size limits set forth
HB96 Enrolled
85 in this article, the court shall forthwith immediately issue
86 an order to the sheriff, returnable in no later than 30 days
87 thereafter from issuance, commanding him or her to summon
88 three disinterested householders or freeholders of the county
89 in which the homestead is situated, who located to serve as
90 commissioners. These individuals, after having been sworn by
91 the sheriff or some officer an authorized officer to
92 administer oaths to faithfully discharge their duty, shall, if
93 practicable possible, shall set off and allot define, by metes
94 and bounds, the homestead exempt to the defendant exempt from
95 levy and sale under process, having regard considering both to
96 the quality and value of the real estate and to the selection
97 of the defendant and taking land most contiguous to the
98 dwelling, and including such, the defendant's selection, and
99 the proximity to the dwelling, including the dwelling and
100 appurtenances. The commissioners, as soon as practicable,
101 shall make return of the homestead so allotted and set off by
102 them, in writing subscribed by them, to the sheriff, shall
103 make a written report of the homestead they have allotted and
104 set off, signed by them, to the sheriff who shall make due
105 return thereof submit the report to the court issuing the
106 order.; and the The homestead, thus once allotted and set off,
107 shall be released from the levy and the residue of the
108 remaining land sold under the order of the court, unless for
109 good cause shown, the courts shall set aside the
110 commissioners' return unless the court finds good cause to set
111 aside the commissioners' report, in which event another a new
112 order for summoning to summon commissioners shall be issued.
Page 4

order for summoning to summon commissioners shall be issued.
HB96 Enrolled
113 (2) If the commissioners individuals summoned, to serve
114 as commissioners or any of them, shall fail to act, the
115 sheriff shall summon others to fill their places.
116 (b) If the homestead, after having been being reduced
117 to its lowest practicable area smallest practical size, still
118 exceeds in value $5,000 (or if a husband and wife have both
119 claimed the exemption to which each is entitled, $10,000) the
120 value exemption limits set forth in this article thereby
121 rendering it impracticable to allot and set it the parcel off
122 under subsection (a) of this section, the commissioners shall
123 so make return a report to the sheriff., who The sheriff
124 shall thereupon then proceed, as in other cases, to advertise
125 and offer the same property for sale under the process. If, at
126 the sale, he or she receives a bid therefor exceeding $5,000
127 (or if a husband and wife have both claimed the exemption to
128 which each is entitled, $10,000) exceeding the value limits
129 set forth in this article, he or she shall sell the same
130 property, and of the purchase money $5,000 an amount equal to
131 the exemption allowed under this article shall be paid to the
132 defendant (or, divided between the spouses if a husband and
133 wife have both claimed the exemption, $5,000 paid to each), or
134 paid into the court for him or her, in lieu of the homestead.,
135 and the The excess only shall be applied to the satisfaction
136 of the process debt.; but if If there are no bids no bid in
137 excess of the exemption allowed under this article, $5,000 (or
138 if a husband and wife have both claimed the exemption to which
139 each is entitled, $10,000) shall be received, the sheriff
140 shall discharge the levy at the plaintiff's cost and return
Page 5

shall discharge the levy at the plaintiff's cost and return
HB96 Enrolled
141 the process., and thereafter Subsequently, no process issued
142 to enforce the plaintiff's demand shall be levied on such
143 homestead so long as it shall continue continues as a
144 homestead, except on the by a written demand of the plaintiff
145 accompanied by an offer in writing to purchase the same
146 homestead for an amount exceeding $5,000 (or if a husband and
147 wife have both claimed the exemption to which each is
148 entitled, $10,000), which the exemption allowed under this
149 article. This offer must state the amount and, at the election
150 of the defendant, shall be binding on the plaintiff.
151 (c) When a sale is made under subsection (b) of this
152 section and any defendant dies before receiving their $5,000
153 standing in lieu of the homestead his or her homestead
154 exemption payment, the same payment shall be paid to his or
155 her personal representative, who shall receive and hold it the
156 exemption payment subject to the homestead rights of the
157 defendant's surviving spouse and minor child or children, or
158 either., if there be such; but, if there be none such, If
159 there is no surviving spouse or minor children, the personal
160 representative shall first apply the same exemption payment to
161 the payment of the demand for the enforcement of which the
162 process issued, debt and the balance he or she shall
163 administer as personal assets of the estate."
164 "§6-10-40
165 When the homestead, after being reduced to the lowest
166 practicable practical area, exceeds $5,000 in value the
167 exemption amount allowed under this article and the husband or
168 wife has aliened the same transferred the property by deed,
Page 6

wife has aliened the same transferred the property by deed,
HB96 Enrolled
169 mortgage, or other conveyance without the spouse's voluntary
170 signature and assent of the spouse, shown and acknowledged as
171 required by law legal acknowledgment, the alienor transferor,
172 or, if he or she fails to act, the spouse, or, if there is no
173 spouse or if he or she fails to act, their minor child or
174 children may, by filing file a complaint, to have the land
175 sold and the homestead interest separated from that of the
176 alienee transferee."
177 Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
178 2026.
Page 7

2026.
HB96 Enrolled
179
180
181
182
183
184
185 ________________________________________________
186 Speaker of the House of Representatives
187
188
189
190 ________________________________________________
191 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
192
193
194 House of Representatives
195
196 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
197 was passed by the House 20-Jan-26.
198
199 John Treadwell
200 Clerk
201
202
203
204
205
206 Senate 26-Feb-26 Passed
207
208
209
Page 8